North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 22. Urban Redevelopment Law.
§ 160A-516.
Issuance of bonds.

The commission shall have power to issue bonds from time to time for any of its corporate purposes including the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans for redevelopment projects. The commission shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring or in exchange for bonds previously issued by it. The commission may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including (without limiting the generality of the foregoing) bonds on which the principal and interest are payable:

Exclusively from the income, proceeds, and revenues of the redevelopment project financed with the proceeds of such bonds; or

Exclusively from the income, proceeds, and revenues of any of its redevelopment projects whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; provided, that any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any loan, grant or contributions, or parts thereof, from the federal government or other source, or a mortgage of any redevelopment project or projects of the commission.

Neither the commissioners of a commission nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance of the bonds. The bonds and other obligations of the commission (and the bonds and obligations shall so state on their face) shall not be a debt of the municipality, the county, or the State and neither the municipality, the county, nor the State shall be liable on the bonds, nor in any event shall the bonds or obligations be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of the commission acquired for the purpose of this Article. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction. Bonds of a commission are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and to be public instrumentalities. The bonds are exempt from all State, county, and municipal taxation or assessment, direct or indirect, general or special, whether imposed for the purpose of general revenue or otherwise, excluding income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds and notes, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds is not subject to taxation as income. Bonds may be issued by a commission under this Article notwithstanding any debt or other limitation prescribed in any statute. This Article without reference to other statutes of the State shall constitute full and complete authority for the authorization and issuance of bonds by the commission under this Article and this authorization and issuance shall not be subject to any conditions, restrictions, or limitations imposed by any other statute whether general, special, or local, except as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Bonds of the commission shall be authorized by its resolution and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption (with or without premium) as such resolution, its trust indenture or mortgage may provide.

Bonds shall be sold by the redevelopment commission at either public or private sale upon such terms and in such manner, consistent with the provisions hereof, as the redevelopment commission may determine. Prior to the public sale of bonds hereunder, the redevelopment commission shall first cause a notice of the sale of the bonds to be published at least once at least 10 days before the date fixed for the receipt of bids for the bonds (i) in a newspaper having the largest or next largest circulation in the redevelopment commission’s area of operation and (ii) in a publication that carries advertisements for the sale of State and municipal bonds published in the City of New York in the State of New York; provided, however, that in its discretion the redevelopment commission may cause any such notice of sale in the New York publication to be published as part of a consolidated notice of sale offering for sale the obligations of other public agencies in addition to the redevelopment commission’s bonds, and provided, further, that any bonds may be sold by the redevelopment commission at private sale upon such terms and conditions as are mutually agreed upon between the commission and the purchaser. No bonds issued pursuant to this Article shall be sold at less than par and accrued interest. The provisions of the Local Government Finance Act shall not be applicable with respect to bonds sold or issued under this Article.

In case any of the commissioners or officers of the commission whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in office until such delivery. Any provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this Article shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action or proceedings involving the validity or enforceability of any bond of the commission or the security therefor, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the commission to aid in financing a redevelopment project, as herein defined, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located and carried out in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this Article.

Bonds (including, without limitation, interim and long-term notes) may be issued or sold under this Article at private sale upon such terms and conditions as may be negotiated and mutually agreed upon by the commission and the purchaser (who may be the government or other public or private lender or purchaser).

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 13; 1961, c. 837, s. 10; 1971, c. 87, s. 3; 1973, c. 426, s. 75; 1981, c. 907, ss. 3, 4; 1995, c. 46, s. 20; 2015-264, s. 16(l).

Local Modification.

City of Fayetteville: 1981, c. 756; 1983, c. 235.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 16(
l
), effective October 1, 2015, deleted “inheritance and gift taxes” preceding “income taxes on the gain” near the middle of the fifth sentence of subsection (b).

§ 160A-517.
Powers in connection with issuance of bonds.

In connection with the issuance of bonds or the incurring of obligations and in order to secure the payment of such bonds or obligations, the commission, in addition to its other powers, shall have power:

To pledge all or any part of its gross or net rents, fees or revenues to which its right then exists or may thereafter come into existence;

To mortgage all or any part of its real or personal property, then owned or thereafter acquired;

To covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues, or against mortgaging all or any part of its real or personal property, to which its right or title then exists or may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien on such revenues or property; to covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any redevelopment project or any part thereof; and to covenant as to what other, or additional debts or obligations may be incurred by it;

To covenant as to the bonds to be issued and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, and as to the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof; to provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds, to covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon; and to covenant for the redemption of the bonds and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

To covenant (subject to the limitations contained in this Article) as to the amount of revenues to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees and other revenues, and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof; to create or to authorize the creation of special funds for moneys held for operating costs, debt service, reserves, or other purposes, and to covenant as to the use and disposition of the moneys held in such funds;

To prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

To covenant as to the use, maintenance and replacement of any of or all of its real or personal property, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys, and to warrant its title to such property;

To covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenants, conditions or obligations; and to covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds or obligations shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

To vest in any obligees of the commissions the right to enforce the payment of the bonds or any covenants securing or relating to the bonds; to vest in any obligee or obligees holding a specified amount in bonds the right, in the event of a default to take possession of and use, operate and manage any redevelopment project or any part thereof, title to which is in the commission, or any funds connected therewith, and to collect the rents and revenues arising therefrom and to dispose of such moneys in accordance with the agreement with such obligees; to provide for the powers and duties of such obligees and to limit the liabilities thereof, and to provide the terms and conditions upon which such obligees may enforce any covenant or rights securing or relating to the bonds; and

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers herein granted; to make such covenants (other than and in addition to the covenants herein expressly authorized) and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of said commission, as will tend to make the bonds more marketable notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein.

The commission shall have power by its resolution, trust indenture, mortgage lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, the right (in addition to all rights that may otherwise be conferred), upon the happening of an event of default as defined in such resolution or instrument, by suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction:

To cause possession of any redevelopment project or any part thereof title to which is in the commission, to be surrendered to any such obligee;

To obtain the appointment of a receiver of any redevelopment project of said commission or any part thereof, title to which is in the commission and of the rents and profits therefrom. If such receiver be appointed, he may enter and take possession of, carry out, operate and maintain such project or any part therefrom and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of said commission as the court shall direct; and

To require said commission and the commissioners, officers, agents and employees thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 14; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-518.
Right of obligee.

An obligee of the commission shall have the right in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding at law or in equity to compel said commission and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of said commission with or for the benefit of such obligee, and to require the carrying out of any or all such covenants and agreements of said commission and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon said commission by this Article; and

By suit, action or proceeding in equity, to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of said commission.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 15; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-519.
Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking or carrying out of a redevelopment project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Dedicate, sell, convey or lease any of its interest in any property, or grant easements, licenses or any other rights or privileges therein to a commission;

Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished in connection with a redevelopment project;

Furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places, which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of the redevelopment;

Cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the commission of the character which the public body is otherwise empowered to undertake or furnish for the same or other purposes;

Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers granted in this section;

Do any and all things necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning or carrying out of a redevelopment plan.

Any sale, conveyance, or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without public notice, advertisement or public bidding.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 16; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-520.
Grant of funds by community.

Any municipality located within the area of operation of a commission may appropriate funds to a commission for the purpose of aiding such commission in carrying out any of its powers and functions under this Article. To obtain funds for this purpose, the municipality may levy taxes and may in the manner prescribed by law issue and sell its bonds.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 17; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-521.
Records and reports.

The books and records of a commission shall at all times be open and subject to inspection by the public.

A copy of all bylaws and rules and regulations and amendments thereto adopted by it, from time to time, shall be filed with the city clerk and shall be open for public inspection.

At least once each year a report of its activities for the preceding year and such other reports as may be required shall be made. Copies of such reports shall be filed with the mayor and governing body of the municipality.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 18; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-522.
Title of purchaser.

Any instrument executed by a commission and purporting to convey any right, title or interest in any property under this Article shall be conclusive evidence of compliance with the provisions of this Article insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees or transferees of such property is concerned.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 19; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-523.
Preparation of general plan by local governing body.

The governing body of any municipality or county, which is not otherwise authorized to create a planning commission with power to prepare a general plan for the development of the community, is hereby authorized and empowered to prepare such a general plan prior to the initiation and carrying out of a redevelopment project under this Article.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 20; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-524.
Inconsistent provisions.

Insofar as the provisions of this Article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this Article shall be controlling.

History.

1951, c. 1095, s. 22; 1955, c. 1349; 1957, c. 502, s. 4; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-525.
Certain actions and proceedings validated.

All proceedings, resolutions, ordinances, motions, notices, findings, determinations, and other actions of redevelopment commissions, incorporated cities and towns, governing bodies, and planning boards and commissions, had and taken prior to January 1, 1965, pursuant to or purporting to comply with the Urban Redevelopment Law (G.S. 160A-500 to 160A-526) and incident to the creation and organization of redevelopment commissions and appointment of members thereof, designation of redevelopment and project areas, findings and determinations respecting conditions in redevelopment and project areas, preparation, development, review, processing and approval of urban redevelopment projects and plans, including redevelopment plans, calling and holding of public hearings, and the time and manner of giving and publishing notices thereof, are hereby in all respects legalized, ratified, approved, validated and confirmed, and all such actions are declared to be valid and lawfully authorized; provided, however, that no such action shall be legalized, ratified, approved, validated or confirmed, under this section if they appertain to any redevelopment or project area, the acquisition or taking of any property in any such area, any urban redevelopment project or any redevelopment plan respecting which any decree or judgment has been rendered by the Supreme Court of North Carolina prior to May 25, 1965.

History.

1963, c. 194; 1965, c. 680; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§ 160A-526.
Contracts and agreements validated.

All contracts or agreements of redevelopment commissions heretofore entered into with the federal government or its agencies, and with municipalities or others relating to financial assistance for redevelopment projects in which it was required that loans or advances shall bear an interest rate in excess of six per centum (6%) per annum, or in which a municipality or others had agreed to pay funds equal to the interest in excess of six per centum (6%) per annum are hereby validated, ratified, confirmed, approved and declared legal with respect to the payment of interest in excess of six per centum (6%), and all things done or performed in reference thereto. The redevelopment commissions are hereby authorized to assume the full obligation of the municipalities under the contracts or agreements with reference to interest in excess of six per centum (6%), and to reimburse any municipality which has made any interest payment under such contracts or agreements.

History.

1971, c. 87, s. 4; 1973, c. 426, s. 75.

§§ 160A-527 through 160A-534.

Reserved for future codification purposes.